Utah statutes.
26-7-5.   Public education and outreach regarding substances harmful during
pregnancy.
Beginning on July 1, 2008, and ending on June 30, 2009, the department shall,
under the direction of the Utah Substance Abuse and Anti-violence Coordinating
Council, created in Section 63M-7-303, and in consultation with the Division
of Substance Abuse and Mental Health, within the Department of Human Services,
conduct a public education and outreach program to inform pregnant women and
women who may become pregnant of:
(1)  the danger of using alcohol, tobacco, or other harmful substances during
pregnancy;
(2)  treatment and other assistance available to help women avoid or stop the
use or abuse of a substance described in Subsection (1); and
(3)  legal protections provided by law or court rule that prohibit information
relating to treatment received under Subsection (2) from being used as
evidence against the woman in court.
